Wyoming statutes. Title 40 Trade and Commerce
Article 1. Protection of Copyright Users

§ 40-13-101.
Short title.

This act [§§

40-13-101

through

40-13-113

] may be cited as the “Protection of Copyright Users Act”.

History.

Laws 1975, ch. 200, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 40-114.

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

What constitutes fair use of medical, scientific and technical writings with respect to copyright infringement action, 144 ALR Fed 537.

What constitutes derivative work under the Copyright Act of 1976, 149 ALR Fed 527.

§ 40-13-102.
Definitions.

The following words, terms and phrases, when used in this act [§§

40-13-101

through

40-13-113

], shall have the meaning ascribed in this section, except where the context clearly indicates a different meaning:

“Blanket license” includes any device or contract whereby public performance of musical compositions for profit is authorized of combined copyrights of two (2) or more owners;

“Blanket royalty or fee” includes any device or contract whereby prices for performing rights of musical compositions are not based upon the performance of individual copyrights;

“Composition” includes any and all musical, instrumental or vocal, compositions, which may be transcribed and reproduced by mechanical, electronic, magnetic means or devices, or any method now known or later developed;

“Copyright” means the exclusive rights and privileges provided for under the constitution of the United States and federal copyright laws;

“Music licensing agency” means and includes any person, corporation or any association, society, partnership, union, or other organization of two (2) or more copyright owners or proprietors, which has or claims the exclusive or nonexclusive authority to issue, grant or to contract for, performing rights licenses for two (2) or more copyright owners. When two (2) or more copyright owners or proprietors are represented by the same agent or representative, this agent or representative shall be deemed to be a “music licensing agency”;

“Performing rights” means “public performance for profit” of musical compositions;

“Person” means any individual, resident or nonresident of this state, and every domestic or foreign or alien partnership, society, association, corporation, or other organization;

“User” means any person, who, directly or indirectly, performs, or causes to be performed, musical compositions for profit.

History.

Laws 1975, ch. 200, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 40-115; Laws 1977, ch. 75, §§ 1, 2.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Laches or undue delay as defense to action based on copyright, 148 ALR Fed 413.

§ 40-13-103.
Licensing requirements.

No music licensing agency and no copyright owner who is a member of such music licensing agency or who licenses the performing rights to his music through a music licensing agency shall license the use of, or in any manner whatsoever dispose of, in this state, the performing rights in or to any musical composition which has been copyrighted, and is the subject of a valid existing copyright under the laws of the United States or collect any compensation on account of any sale, license or other disposition, unless such music licensing agency and each copyright owner shall:

File annually with the secretary of state in duplicate a certified copy of each performing rights contract or license agreement made available from such music licensing agency or copyright owner to any user within the state;

Issue, upon request, licenses of performing rights of the compositions in the repertory of the music licensing agency to a radio broadcasting network, telecasting network or music service, on terms which authorize the simultaneous and delayed performance by broadcasting or telecasting or simultaneous performance by music service as the case may be, by some or all of the stations in this state affiliated with such radio or television network or by some or all subscriber outlets in this state affiliated with any music service without requiring a separate license for such station or subscriber for such performance.

History.

Laws 1975, ch. 200, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 40-116; Laws 1977, ch. 75, § 2.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Federal copyright infringement action not barred. —

Failure to comply with the licensing and filing requirements of this section does not bar a federal copyright infringement action in federal court. Ocasek v. Hegglund, 673 F. Supp. 1084, 1987 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 16115 (D. Wyo. 1987).

§ 40-13-104.
Discrimination prohibited.

All groups and persons affected by this act [§§

40-13-101

through

40-13-113

] are prohibited from discriminating against the citizens of this state by charging higher and more inequitable rates for music licenses in this state than in other states.

History.

Laws 1975, ch. 200, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 40-117.

Cross references. —

As to discrimination generally, see chapter 4 of this title.

§ 40-13-105.
Licenses and fees; choices.

The licenses and fees made available pursuant to this article shall provide users with genuine economic choices between the various licenses and fees provided for application within the state of Wyoming.

History.

Laws 1975, ch. 200, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 40-118; Laws 2004, ch. 130, § 1.

The 2004 amendment

substituted “article” for “section.”

Laws 2004, ch. 130, § 4, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 19, 2004.

Conflicting legislation. —

Laws 2004, ch. 130, § 3, provides: “Any other act adopted by the Wyoming legislature during the same session in which this act is adopted shall be given precedence and shall prevail over the amendments in this act to the extent that such acts are in conflict with this act.”

§ 40-13-106.
Time for filing contracts and licenses; filing fee.

The contracts and licenses required by this article shall be filed with the secretary of state. A filing fee of five dollars ($5.00) shall be paid to the secretary of state at the time of each filing.

History.

Laws 1975, ch. 200, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 40-119; Laws 2004, ch. 130, § 1.

The 2004 amendment

substituted “article” for “section.”

Laws 2004, ch. 130, § 4, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 19, 2004.

Conflicting legislation. —

Laws 2004, ch. 130, § 3, provides: “Any other act adopted by the Wyoming legislature during the same session in which this act is adopted shall be given precedence and shall prevail over the amendments in this act to the extent that such acts are in conflict with this act.”

§ 40-13-107.
Blanket license fees.

Charges and fees under any blanket license for a blanket royalty or fee shall be valid and enforceable only to the extent that the music licensing agency shall have complied with the provisions of this act [§§

40-13-101

through

40-13-113

].

History.

Laws 1975, ch. 200, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 40-121.

§ 40-13-108.
Doing business defined; amenability to process; service on nonresidents.

All persons, groups, corporations, associations, foreign or domestic, subject to this act [§§

40-13-101

through

40-13-113

] shall be deemed to be doing business within this state and amenable to the process of the courts of the state of Wyoming when:

Any such persons, combinations or groups have been issued licenses, either from within or from without the state, for the privilege of using commercially and publicly any copyrighted work or works pooled in a common group or entity;

When any of the functions of the entity, organization, pool or combines, have been performed in this state.

If such owners of copyrights comply with the provisions of this act they shall be granted the privilege of conducting business within this state in a legal manner, and may invoke the benefits of the state government and its political subdivisions in their behalf, using all of the privileges available to the citizens of this state. Use of such privileges shall be deemed to be an acceptance of the provisions of this act.

The acceptance by such persons of the rights and privileges conferred by the law of this state to any of its citizens shall be deemed equivalent to and construed to be an appointment by such nonresidents of the secretary of state of the state of Wyoming to be their true and lawful attorney upon whom may be served all summons and processes growing out of a violation of this act. Service of such summons or process shall be made by leaving a copy with a fee of five dollars ($5.00) with the secretary of state of Wyoming, or in his office. Such service shall be sufficient and valid personal service upon any such nonresident defendant, copyright holder or owner, persons or defendants, combination, entity or organization. Notice of such service and a copy of the summons or process shall be forthwith sent by registered mail requiring personal delivery, by the prosecutor bringing any action under this chapter, to any defendant at his last known address, and the defendant’s return receipt and the prosecutor’s affidavit of compliance herewith are appended to the process and entered as a part of the return. The secretary of state shall keep a record of all such summons and process which shall show the day and time of service.

History.

Laws 1975, ch. 200, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 40-122.

Cross references. —

As to service of process, see Rules 4 and 5, W.R.C.P.

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Service of process by mail in international civil action as permissible under Hague Convention, 112 ALR Fed 241.

§ 40-13-109.
Injunction.

In the event any person, or groups of persons, or any combination, refuse to comply with the provisions of this act [§§

40-13-101

through

40-13-113

], then the county attorney for any county or the attorney general upon complaint of any violation, may institute injunction proceedings against the persons in the district court. The court may enjoin all persons from violating the provisions of this act and the constitutional provisions prohibiting price fixing, monopolies and combinations.

History.

Laws 1975, ch. 200, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 40-123; Laws 1981, Sp. Sess., ch. 22, § 1.

Cross references. —

As to injunctions, see Rule 65, W.R.C.P.

§ 40-13-110.
Right to sue; limitation; damages.

Any person in this state who is injured in his business or property or aggrieved by reason of any violation of this act [§§

40-13-101

through

40-13-113

] may sue therefor within six (6) years of said violation in the district court in the county in which the violation or any part thereof took place, to recover any damages sustained as a result of the violation of the terms of this act, and shall be entitled to recover his costs, including reasonable attorney’s fees. The court may in its discretion increase the award of damages to an amount not to exceed three (3) times the actual damages sustained.

History.

Laws 1975, ch. 200, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 40-124.

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Laches or undue delay as defense to action based on copyright, 148 ALR Fed 413.

§ 40-13-111.
Existing contracts not affected.

No blanket license or contract in existence with a user in the state of Wyoming at the time of the passage of this act shall be affected by this act [§§

40-13-101

through

40-13-113

].

History.

Laws 1975, ch. 200, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 40-125.

Editor's notes. —

Laws 1975, ch. 200, was approved on March 14, 1975.

§ 40-13-112.
Special appearances deemed general.

In the event any person, or any defendant is proceeded against as herein outlined, and is served with process according to law, appears in any proceeding by counsel or otherwise, or institutes any special proceeding attacking such proceeding, or makes any motion therein, either special or general, or appears to obtain the judgment of the court solely upon the sufficiency of the service of process, or upon any phase or particularity of the injunction proceedings, such special proceeding or appearance, or motion, or appearance shall be deemed as a general appearance.

History.

Laws 1975, ch. 200, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 40-126.

§ 40-13-113.
Penalty for violations.

A person or music licensing agency who violates this act [§§

40-13-101

through

40-13-113

] is guilty of a high misdemeanor and upon conviction is punishable for each violation by a fine of not to exceed one thousand dollars ($1,000.00), or by imprisonment in the state prison for a period of one (1) year, or both.

History.

Laws 1975, ch. 200, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 40-127.

Severability and repealing clauses. —

Laws 1975, ch. 200, § 2, provides: “In case any part or portion of this act shall be held unconstitutional, such holding shall not affect the validity of this act as a whole or any other part or portion of this act, and if any clause, sentence, paragraph, subdivision, section or part of this act shall for any reason be adjudged invalid, such judgment shall not affect, impair or invalidate the remainder of the act, but shall be strictly confined in its operation and holding to the specific clause, sentence, paragraph, subdivision, section or part thereof, directly involved in the controversy in which such judgment shall have been rendered; and all other acts and laws in conflict herewith are hereby repealed.”